Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 5. Employment Rights for Reserve and National Guard Members

§ 491.
Absence on military service and training; employment and reemployment rights.

Any duly qualified member of the Reserve Components of the U.S. Armed Forces, of the Ready Reserve, or an organized unit of the Vermont National Guard or the National Guard of another state shall, when called to state or federal service, receive the same benefits, privileges, and protections in employment regardless of the activation authority or location of service.
(a) (1) Any duly qualified member of the Reserve Components of the U.S. Armed Forces, of the Ready Reserve, or an organized unit of the Vermont National Guard or the National Guard of another state shall, when called to state or federal service, receive the same benefits, privileges, and protections in employment regardless of the activation authority or location of service.

Upon request, a duly qualified member of the Reserve Components of the U.S. Armed Forces, of the Ready Reserve, or the Vermont National Guard or the National Guard of another state shall be entitled to a leave of absence to engage in military drill, training, or other temporary duty pursuant to state or federal military orders.
(2) (A) Upon request, a duly qualified member of the Reserve Components of the U.S. Armed Forces, of the Ready Reserve, or the Vermont National Guard or the National Guard of another state shall be entitled to a leave of absence to engage in military drill, training, or other temporary duty pursuant to state or federal military orders.

A member of the Vermont National Guard or the National Guard of any state or territory who is ordered to state active duty shall be subject to the requirements of and entitled to the rights, privileges, benefits, and protections provided by the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act (USERRA), 38 U.S.C. §§ 4301-4335.

A leave of absence shall be with or without pay as determined by the employer.

A member of or an applicant for membership in the National Guard in either federal or state status as defined in

20 V.S.A. §§ 366

and 601 shall not be denied initial employment, reemployment, retention of employment, promotion, or any benefit of employment by an employer on the basis of membership, application for membership, performance of service, application for service, or obligation to serve.

An employer shall not discriminate in employment against any person because a person has taken any of the following actions:

enforcement of a provision of this subchapter or federal law;

testified or made a statement in connection with any proceeding under this subchapter or under federal law;

assisted or participated in any investigation under this subchapter or federal law; or

exercised any right provided by this subchapter or under federal law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2007, No. 44

, § 1;

2015, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2021, No. 10

, § 72.

§ 492.
Rights and benefits.

Any absence for military training or State active duty shall not affect the employee’s right to receive normal vacation, sick leave, bonus, advancement, and other advantages of employment normally to be anticipated in the employee’s particular position.

Any person who is absent from employment necessitated by service in the National Guard as permitted under section 491 of this title shall be entitled to the reemployment rights and benefits provided in 38 U.S.C. §§ 4312-4318.

If any member of the Vermont National Guard with civilian employer-sponsored insurance coverage is ordered to State active duty by the Governor for up to 30 days, or if any member of the National Guard of another state who is a Vermont employee with civilian employer-sponsored insurance is ordered to state active duty by the Governor of that state for up to 30 days, the service member may, at the member’s option, continue his or her civilian health insurance under the same terms and conditions as were in effect for the month preceding the member’s call to state active duty, including a continuation of the same levels of employer and employee contributions toward premiums and cost-sharing.
(c) (1) If any member of the Vermont National Guard with civilian employer-sponsored insurance coverage is ordered to State active duty by the Governor for up to 30 days, or if any member of the National Guard of another state who is a Vermont employee with civilian employer-sponsored insurance is ordered to state active duty by the Governor of that state for up to 30 days, the service member may, at the member’s option, continue his or her civilian health insurance under the same terms and conditions as were in effect for the month preceding the member’s call to state active duty, including a continuation of the same levels of employer and employee contributions toward premiums and cost-sharing.

If a member of the Vermont National Guard is called to State active duty for more than 30 days, or if a member of the National Guard of another state who is a Vermont employee is called to state active duty for more than 30 days, the member may continue his or her civilian health insurance. For a member whose employer chooses not to continue regular contributions toward premiums and cost-sharing during the period of the member’s state active duty in excess of 30 days, the State of Vermont shall be responsible for paying the employer’s share of the premium and cost-sharing.

The Office of the Adjutant General shall administer this subsection and may adopt policies, procedures, and guidelines to carry out the purposes of this subsection, including developing employee notice requirements, enforcement provisions, and a process for the State to remit the employer’s share of premiums and cost-sharing to the appropriate entities pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2015, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 493.
Enforcement.

If any employer fails to comply with any of the provisions of this subchapter, the employee may bring an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court seeking compensatory and punitive damages or equitable relief, including restraint of prohibited acts, restitution of wages or other benefits, reinstatement, costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other appropriate relief.

The Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may enforce the provisions of this subchapter by bringing an action in Superior Court for legal and equitable relief and may conduct civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458-2461

as though a violation of this subchapter were an unfair act in commerce.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6a;

2015, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.